Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 3. Trustees.
Sec. 13.36.153.
Restrictions on exercising certain trustee powers.

Notwithstanding AS

13.36.107

, a trustee who is not an independent trustee may not exercise a power to make or cause to be made a discretionary distribution of either principal or income

to or for the direct or indirect benefit of the trustee individually or to any person holding a power to remove and replace the trustee, except to the extent that the power is exercised in accordance with an ascertainable standard that relates to the health, education, maintenance, or support of the trustee or person;

to satisfy a legal obligation that is owed by the trustee individually or by any person holding a power to remove and replace this trustee; or

if the distribution would constitute a taxable gift from the trustee individually or from a person holding a power to remove and replace the trustee.

The prohibitions of (a) of this section apply to a trustee even if the governing instrument states that the trustee may make distributions in the trustee’s uncontrolled, absolute, or total discretion, or that distributions are not subject to review by a court, or the governing instrument otherwise indicates that distributions by the trustee are not subject to reasonableness when the trustee exercises discretion.

If a trustee is prohibited by (a) of this section from exercising a power and if one or more other trustees are not prohibited by (a) of this section from exercising the power, the other trustees may exercise the power. If there is not a trustee who can exercise a power prohibited under (a) of this section, a party in interest may apply to the superior court to appoint an independent trustee to exercise the power.

The provisions of (a) of this section do not prohibit a trustee from making payments, including reimbursement of and compensation of an independent trustee appointed under (c) of this section, for the protection of the trust or the assets of the trust, or for the expenses, losses, or liabilities incurred in the collection, care, administration, or protection of the trust or the assets of the trust.

Except as provided in (f) of this section, this section applies to

a trust that is created on or after August 9, 2000; or

the decisions and actions of a trust that is in existence on August 9, 2000, if the decisions are made, or the actions occur, on or after August 9, 2000.

The application provisions of (e) of this section do not apply if

the terms of the trust, including the terms as amended, expressly provide that this section does not apply and either specifically refer to this section or otherwise clearly demonstrate the intent that this section does not apply; or

the trust is irrevocable and all parties in interest elect under (g) of this section not to be subject to the application of this section; an election under this paragraph must be made on or before January 1, 2003, or three years after the date on which the trust becomes irrevocable, whichever date is later; however, notwithstanding AS

13.36.080

, the trustee does not have a duty to inform the parties in interest of this election.

The election allowed under (f) of this section shall be made by a written declaration that is delivered to the trustee.

The prohibitions of (a) of this section do not apply to a trustee with respect to trust property, including income from the trust property, if the trust property would, upon the death of the trustee, be included, for any reason other than the exercise of a power prohibited by (a) of this section, in the gross estate of the trustee for federal estate tax purposes.

This section does not create a new cause of action, or impair a cause of action existing before August 9, 2000, if the new or existing cause of action relates to the exercise of a power prohibited by (a) of this section that was exercised before August 9, 2000.

In this section, “independent trustee” means a trustee that is not related or subordinate, as defined in 26 U.S.C. 672(c), to the person having the power to remove the trustee or to any beneficiary.

History.

(§ 6 ch 40 SLA 2000)

Sec. 13.36.155.
Permitted sales between trusts held by same corporate trustee.

If the transaction is fair to both trusts and if the transaction is not prohibited by the instruments creating the trustee relationship, a corporate trustee may sell to itself as trustee of a trust the following held by the corporate trustee as trustee for another trust:

stocks, bonds, and other securities listed on a securities exchange supervised by the United States Securities and Exchange Commission; and

obligations of the United States treasury and obligations of United States government agencies.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Sec. 13.36.157.
Exercise of power of appointment.

An authorized trustee with unlimited discretion to invade trust principal may appoint part or all of that principal to a trustee of an appointed trust for, and only for the benefit of, one or more current beneficiaries of the invaded trust to the exclusion of other current beneficiaries. A permissible appointee of a power of appointment held by a beneficiary of the appointed trust is not considered a beneficiary of the appointed trust, regardless of whether the permissible appointee is a current beneficiary or a successor and remainder beneficiary.

An authorized trustee exercising the power under (a) of this section may grant a discretionary power of appointment, including a presently exercisable power of appointment, in the appointed trust to one or more of the current beneficiaries of the invaded trust, to the extent that the beneficiary who is granted the power to appoint is authorized to receive the principal outright under the terms of the invaded trust. A permissible appointee is not limited to the beneficiaries of the invaded trust.

Under (a) and (b) of this section, if the beneficiaries of the invaded trust are described by a class, the beneficiaries of the appointed trust may include present or future members of that class.

An authorized trustee with the power to invade trust principal but without unlimited discretion may appoint part or all of the principal of the trust to a trustee of an appointed trust if the current beneficiaries of the appointed trust are the same as the current beneficiaries of the invaded trust and the successor and remainder beneficiaries of the appointed trust are the same as the successor and remainder beneficiaries of the invaded trust. The shares of the current beneficiaries of the appointed trust must be the same as the shares of the current beneficiaries of the invaded trust, and the shares of the successor and remainder beneficiaries of the appointed trust must be the same as the shares of the successor and remainder beneficiaries of the invaded trust.

If the authorized trustee exercises the power under (d) of this section, the appointed trust must include the same standard authorizing the trustee to distribute the income or invade the principal of the appointed trust as the standard in the invaded trust. However, the standard authorizing the trustee to distribute the income or invade the principal of the appointed trust may be changed if the trustee appoints to an appointed trust that is a special needs trust, a pooled trust, or a third-party trust.

If an authorized trustee exercises the power under (d) and (e) of this section to extend the duration of the appointed trust beyond the duration of the invaded trust for any period after the invaded trust would have otherwise terminated under the provisions of the invaded trust, the appointed trust, in addition to the language required to be included in the appointed trust under (e) of this section, may also provide an additional trustee with unlimited discretion to invade the principal of the appointed trust during the extended duration. The trustee with unlimited discretion continues to be subject to the restrictions in (d) — (h) of this section.

Under (d) — (f) of this section, if the beneficiaries of the invaded trust are described by a class, the beneficiaries of the appointed trust include present or future members of that class.

If the authorized trustee exercises the power under (d) — (g) of this section and if the invaded trust grants a power of appointment to a beneficiary of the trust, the appointed trust must grant this power of appointment in the appointed trust, and the class of permissible appointees shall be the same as in the invaded trust.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 17 SLA 2000; am §§ 9, 10 ch 66 SLA 2006; am § 9 ch 7 SLA 2008; am § 9 ch 45 SLA 2013)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 48(b), ch. 45, SLA 2013, provides that this section, as repealed and reenacted in 2013, applies “to a trust that exists before, on, or after September 9, 2013.”

Sec. 13.36.158.
Additional provisions relating to exercise of a power of appointment.

An exercise of the power to invade trust principal under AS

13.36.157

is the exercise of a special power of appointment.

The appointed trust to which an authorized trustee appoints the assets of the invaded trust under AS

13.36.157

may have a duration that is longer than the duration set out in the invaded trust.

If an authorized trustee has unlimited discretion to invade the principal of a trust and if the same trustee or another trustee has a power, not dependent on unlimited discretion, to invade principal under the trust instrument, the authorized trustee having unlimited discretion may exercise the power of appointment under AS

13.36.157(a)

— (c).

An authorized trustee may exercise the power to appoint in favor of an appointed trust under AS

13.36.157

whether or not there is a current need to invade principal under the terms of the invaded trust.

An authorized trustee exercising the power under AS

13.36.157

—

13.36.159

has a fiduciary duty to exercise the power in the best interests of one or more proper objects of the exercise of the power and as a prudent person would exercise the power under the prevailing circumstances. The authorized trustee may not exercise the power under AS

13.36.157

—

13.36.159

if there is substantial evidence of a contrary intent of the settlor and it cannot be established that the settlor would be likely to have changed this intention under the circumstances existing at the time the trustee exercises the power. The provisions of the invaded trust may not be viewed alone as substantial evidence of a contrary intent of the settlor unless the invaded trust expressly prohibits the exercise of the power in the manner intended by the authorized trustee.

The provisions of AS

13.36.157

—

13.36.159

may not be construed to abridge the right of a trustee to appoint property further in trust under the terms of the governing instrument of a trust, another provision of law, or common law, or as directed by a court having jurisdiction over the trust.

Nothing in AS

13.36.157

—

13.36.159

creates or implies a duty to exercise a power to invade principal. An inference of impropriety may not be made, and liability is not incurred, as a result of an authorized trustee not exercising the power conferred under AS

13.36.157

.

A power authorized by AS

13.36.157

may be exercised, subject to the provisions of AS

13.36.159(a)

, unless expressly prohibited by the terms of the governing instrument. A general prohibition against amending or revoking the invaded trust and a provision that constitutes a spendthrift clause do not preclude the exercise of a power under AS

13.36.157

.

An authorized trustee may not exercise a power authorized by AS

13.36.157

to

reduce, limit, or modify a beneficiary’s current right to a mandatory distribution of income or principal, a mandatory annuity or unitrust interest, a right to withdraw a percentage of the value of the trust, or a right to withdraw a specified dollar amount, if the mandatory right has come into effect with respect to the beneficiary, but the mandatory right may be reduced, limited, or modified during any extended duration of the trust; however, notwithstanding the other provisions in this paragraph, but subject to the other limitations in AS

13.36.157

—

13.36.159

, an authorized trustee may exercise a power authorized by AS 13.36.157 to appoint to an appointed trust that is a special needs trust, a pooled trust, or a third-party trust;

decrease or indemnify against a trustee’s liability or exonerate a trustee from liability for failure to exercise reasonable care, diligence, and prudence unless the court having jurisdiction over the trust specifies otherwise;

eliminate a provision granting another person the right to remove or replace the authorized trustee exercising the power under AS 13.36.157 unless a court having jurisdiction over the trust specifies otherwise;

fix as binding and conclusive the value of an asset for purposes of distribution, allocation, or otherwise; or

jeopardize

the deduction or exclusion originally claimed with respect to a contribution to the invaded trust that qualified for the annual exclusion under 26 U.S.C. 2503(b), the marital deduction under 26 U.S.C. 2056(a) or 26 U.S.C. 2523(a), or the charitable deduction under 26 U.S.C. 170(a), 26 U.S.C. 642(c), 26 U.S.C. 2055(a), or 26 U.S.C. 2522(a) (Internal Revenue Code);

the qualification of a transfer as a direct skip under 26 U.S.C. 2642(c) (Internal Revenue Code);

the election to treat a corporation as a subchapter S corporation under 26 U.S.C. 1362 (Internal Revenue Code); or

another specific tax benefit for which a contribution originally qualified for income, gift, estate, or generation-skipping transfer tax purposes under 26 U.S.C. (Internal Revenue Code).

Before exercising the power under AS

13.36.157

, an authorized trustee shall consider the tax implications of the exercise of the power.

An authorized trustee may not exercise a power described in AS

13.36.157

—

13.36.159

in violation of the limitations on validity in AS

34.27.051

or

34.27.100

, or the restrictions on exercising certain powers in AS

13.36.153

by trustees who are not independent. A violation voids the entire exercise of the power unless the exercise is modified to correct the violation.

Unless a court having jurisdiction over the trust directs otherwise, an authorized trustee may not exercise a power authorized by AS

13.36.157

to change the provisions regarding the determination of the compensation of a trustee. The commissions or other compensation payable to the trustees of the invaded trust may continue to be paid to the trustees of the appointed trust during the term of the appointed trust and shall be determined in the same manner as for the invaded trust.

A trustee may not receive a payment, a commission, or other compensation for appointing property from the invaded trust to an appointed trust under AS

13.36.157

. However, a trustee may be compensated at a reasonable rate for the time spent considering and implementing the exercise of a power to appoint.

Unless the invaded trust expressly provides otherwise, the provisions in AS

13.36.157

—

13.36.159

apply to

a trust, whether testamentary or inter vivos, governed by the laws of this state, including a trust whose governing law has been changed to the laws of this state; and

a trust that has a trustee who is an individual domiciled in this state, or a trustee that is an entity having an office in this state, if a majority of the trustees select this state as the location for the primary administration of the trust and the selection is made by an instrument in writing that is signed and acknowledged by a majority of the trustees; the instrument exercising this selection shall be kept with the records of the invaded trust.

In this section, “Internal Revenue Code” means the Internal Revenue Code of the United States (26 U.S.C.) as it exists on September 9, 2013 and as it is amended from time to time.

History.

(§ 10 ch 45 SLA 2013)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 48(b), ch. 45, SLA 2013, provides that this section applies “to a trust that exists before, on, or after September 9, 2013.”

Sec. 13.36.159.
Implementation of power of appointment.

Unless the authorized trustee provides otherwise, the appointment of

all of the assets making up the principal of the invaded trust to an appointed trust includes subsequently discovered assets of the invaded trust and undistributed principal of the invaded trust acquired after the appointment to the appointed trust;

a part but not all of the assets making up the principal of the invaded trust to an appointed trust may not include subsequently discovered assets belonging to the invaded trust or principal paid to or acquired by the invaded trust after the appointment to the appointed trust; those subsequently discovered assets remain the assets of the invaded trust.

The exercise of the power to appoint to an appointed trust under AS

13.36.157

shall be evidenced by an instrument in writing that is signed, dated, and acknowledged by the authorized trustee. The exercise of the power is effective 30 days after the date of service of the instrument as specified in (d) of this section, unless the persons entitled to notice consent in writing to a sooner effective date.

An authorized trustee may exercise the power authorized by AS

13.36.157

without the consent of the settlor or a person interested in the invaded trust and without court approval. However, an authorized trustee may seek court approval for the exercise. When seeking court approval, notice shall be sent to all qualified beneficiaries.

A copy of the invaded trust, the appointed trust, and the instrument exercising the power shall be delivered to

the settlor, if living, of the invaded trust;

a person having the right, under the terms of the invaded trust, to remove or replace the authorized trustee exercising the power under AS

13.36.157

; and

a qualified beneficiary or a person who may represent and bind a qualified beneficiary under AS

13.06.120

.

Notice under (d) of this section to a qualified beneficiary is not required if the settlor has exempted the authorized trustee from providing notification or information to beneficiaries under AS

13.36.080(b)

. Notice under (d) of this section shall be provided under AS

13.06.110

.

The instrument exercising the power must state whether the appointment is of all or part of the assets making up the principal of the invaded trust and, if a part, the approximate percentage of the value of the principal of the invaded trust that is the subject of the appointment. A failure to state whether the appointment is of all or part of the assets creates a presumption that only part of the assets is to be appointed.

A person entitled to notice under (d) of this section may object to the trustee’s exercise of the power under AS

13.36.157

—

13.36.159

by serving a written notice of objection on the trustee before the effective date of the exercise of the power. The failure to object does not constitute consent.

The receipt of a copy of the instrument exercising the power does not, before the expiration of the limitation period in AS

13.36.100

with respect to a report disclosing the exercise, affect the right of a qualified beneficiary to object to the exercise of the power under AS

13.36.157

and to request the court to modify or to reverse the exercise.

A copy of the instrument exercising the power shall be kept with the records of the invaded trust.

History.

(§ 10 ch 45 SLA 2013)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 48(b), ch. 45, SLA 2013, provides that this section applies “to a trust that exists before, on, or after September 9, 2013.”

Sec. 13.36.160.
Corporate trustee buying its own or an affiliate’s securities.

A corporate trustee may not purchase for a trust shares of its own stock, or its bonds, or other securities, or the stock, bonds, or other securities of an affiliate.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Sec. 13.36.165.
Withdrawals from mingled trust funds.

If a person who is a trustee of two or more trusts mingles the funds of two or more trusts in the same aggregate of cash or in the same bank or brokerage account or other investment, and if a withdrawal is made from the cash aggregate, account, or investment by the trustee for the trustee’s own benefit, for the benefit of a third person who is not a beneficiary or creditor of one or more of the trusts, or for an unknown purpose, the withdrawal must be charged first to the amount of the personal cash, credit, or other property, if any, of the trustee in the mingled fund, and, after the exhaustion of the trustee’s cash, credit, or other property, then to the several trusts in proportion to their several interests in the cash, credit, or other property in the cash aggregate, account, or investment at the time of the withdrawal. Nothing in this section is intended to authorize the mingling of trust funds.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Sec. 13.36.169.
Elections to qualify property for marital deduction and generation-skipping transfer tax allocations.

Unless a governing instrument specifically refers to this section and provides otherwise, a trustee who makes an election under 26 U.S.C. 2056, 2056A, or 2523 (Internal Revenue Code), or who makes an allocation under 26 U.S.C. 2632 (Internal Revenue Code), may benefit personally from the election or allocation and is not required to reimburse another person interested in the election or allocation, to make an equitable adjustment, or to treat interested persons impartially with respect to the election or allocation.

Unless a governing instrument specifically refers to this section and provides otherwise, if an election is made under 26 U.S.C. 2056, 2056A, or 2523 (Internal Revenue Code), if an allocation is made under 26 U.S.C. 2632 (Internal Revenue Code), or if division of a trust benefits the persons interested in the trust, the trustee may divide the trust into two or more separate trusts of equal or unequal value if the terms of the separate resulting trusts are substantially identical to the terms of the trust before the division. The allocation of assets must be based on the fair market value of the assets at the time of the division.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, this section applies to

a trust that is created on or after August 9, 2000; or

the decisions and actions of a trust that is in existence on August 9, 2000 if the decisions are made or actions occur on or after August 9, 2000.

The application provisions of (c) of this section do not apply if

the terms of the trust, including the terms as amended, expressly provide that this section does not apply and either specifically refer to this section or otherwise clearly demonstrate the intent that this section does not apply; or

the trust is irrevocable and all parties in interest elect not to be subject to the application of this section; an election under this paragraph must be made on or before January 1, 2003, or three years after the date on which the trust becomes irrevocable, whichever date is later; however, notwithstanding AS

13.36.080

, the trustee does not have a duty to inform the parties in interest of this election; the election allowed under this paragraph must be made by a written declaration delivered to the trustee.

History.

(§ 7 ch 40 SLA 2000)

Sec. 13.36.170.
Unenforceable oral trust created by deed.

When an interest in real property is conveyed by deed to a person in a trust that is unenforceable under AS

09.25.010

—

09.25.020

and the intended trustee or the trustee’s successor in interest holds title but refuses to carry out the trust because of AS

09.25.010

—

09.25.020

, the intended trustee or the trustee’s successor in interest, except to the extent that the successor in interest is a bona fide purchaser of a legal interest in the real property, shall convey the interest in real property to the settlor or the settlor’s successor in interest. A court having jurisdiction may prescribe the conditions for conveying the interest to the settlor or the settlor’s successor in interest.

If the intended trustee of an unenforceable trust under (a) of this section transfers part or all of the trustee’s interest and the interest is transferred to a bona fide purchaser, the intended trustee is liable to the settlor or the settlor’s successor in interest for the value, at the time of the transfer, of the interest transferred, less any offsets that a court determines to be equitable.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Sec. 13.36.175.
Action on contract against trustee in representative capacity.

When a trustee makes a contract that is within the trustee’s powers as trustee or when a predecessor trustee has made a contract within the predecessor trustee’s powers as trustee and a cause of action arises on the contract, the party in whose favor the cause of action has accrued may collect the judgment by execution on the trust property.

In an action under this section, the plaintiff is not required to prove that the trustee could have been reimbursed from the trust fund if the trustee had paid the plaintiff’s claim.

A beneficiary or, in the case of a charitable trust, the attorney general and a corporation that is a beneficiary or agent in the performance of the charitable trust, may intervene in an action under this section and contest the right of the plaintiff to recover.

A judgment may not be rendered in favor of the plaintiff in an action under this section unless the plaintiff proves that, within 30 days after the beginning of the action or within another period set by the court and more than 30 days before obtaining the judgment, the plaintiff has notified each of the beneficiaries who is known to the trustee and who then has a present interest in the existence and nature of the action, or, in the case of a charitable trust, the attorney general of this state and a corporation that is a beneficiary or agent in the performance of the charitable trust. The notice shall be given by mailing copies of the notice with postage prepaid to the beneficiaries at their last known addresses. The trustee shall furnish the plaintiff with a list of names and addresses of the beneficiaries within 10 days after the plaintiff makes a written demand for the list. Notification of the persons on the list constitutes compliance with the duty placed on the plaintiff by this section.

The plaintiff in an action under this section may also hold the trustee who made the contract personally liable on the contract if the contract does not exclude the trustee’s personal liability. In a contract action under this section, the addition of the word “trustee” or the words “as trustee” after the signature of a trustee to a contract creates a presumption, which may only be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence otherwise, of an intent to exclude the trustee from personal liability, and, unless the presumption is rebutted, the trustee is not personally liable under the contract.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to the effect of subsection (c) on Civil Rule 24, see § 23(a), ch. 105, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 13.36.180.
Exoneration or reimbursement for tort.

A trustee who has incurred personal liability for a tort committed in the administration of the trust is entitled to exoneration for the liability from the trust property if the trustee has not discharged the claim, or to reimbursement for the liability out of trust funds if the trustee has paid the claim, if the trustee or an officer or employee of the trustee was not guilty of personal fault in incurring the liability.

If a trustee has incurred personal liability for a tort committed in the administration of the trust and that tort increases the value of the trust property, the trustee is entitled to exoneration or reimbursement to the extent of the increase in value as a result of the tort even though the trustee would not otherwise be entitled to exoneration or reimbursement.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to change the existing law with regard to the liability of trustees of charitable trusts for torts of the trustees or their employees.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Sec. 13.36.185.
Tort liability of trust.

If a trustee or a predecessor of the trustee incurs personal liability for a tort committed in the course of the trustee’s administration, the trustee in the trustee’s representative capacity may be sued and collection made from the trust property if the court determines in the tort action that

the trustee or the trustee’s predecessor, or an officer or employee of the trustee or the trustee’s predecessor, was not guilty of personal fault in incurring the liability; or

although the tort does not fall under (1) of this subsection, the tort increased the value of the trust property.

If the tort is within (a)(1) of this section, the full amount of proven damages may be collected from the trust property.

If the tort is within (a)(2) of this section, collection may not be made from the trust property except to the extent of the increase in the value of the trust property.

A beneficiary may intervene in an action under this section and contest the right of the plaintiff to recover.

In an action against the trustee in the trustee’s representative capacity under this section, the plaintiff is not required to prove that the trustee could have secured reimbursement from the trust fund if the trustee paid the plaintiff’s claim.

A judgment may not be rendered in favor of the plaintiff in an action under this section unless the trustee proves that within 30 days after the beginning of the action, or within another period set by the court and more than 30 days before obtaining the judgment, the trustee notifies each of the beneficiaries who is known to the trustee who then has a present interest in the existence and nature of the action. The notice shall be given by mailing copies of the notice with postage prepaid to the beneficiaries at their last known addresses. The trustee shall furnish the plaintiff with a list of names and addresses of the beneficiaries within 10 days after the plaintiff makes a written demand for the list. Notification of the persons on the list constitutes compliance with the duty placed on the plaintiff by this subsection.

Nothing in this section may be construed to change the existing law with regard to the liability of trustees of charitable trusts for torts of the trustees or their employees.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to the effect of subsection (d) on Civil Rule 24, see § 23(b), ch. 105, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 13.36.190.
Personal liability for tort committed by trustee.

A trustee may be held personally liable for a tort committed by the trustee, or by the trustee’s agents or employees in the course of their agency or employment, subject to the rights of exoneration or reimbursement under AS

13.36.180

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Sec. 13.36.192.
Power of settlor of trust.

The settlor of a trust affected by AS

13.36.105

—

13.36.220

may, by provision in the instrument creating the trust if the trust is created by a writing, by oral statement to the trustee at the time of the creation of the trust if the trust is created orally, or by an amendment of the trust if the settlor reserved the power to amend the trust,

relieve the trustee from any or all of the duties, restrictions, and liabilities that would otherwise be imposed on the trustee by AS

13.36.105

—

13.36.220

;

alter or deny to the trustee any or all of the privileges and powers conferred on the trustee by AS 13.36.105 — 13.36.220; or

add duties, restrictions, liabilities, privileges, or powers, to those imposed or granted by AS 13.36.105 — 13.36.220.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, an act of the settlor may not relieve a trustee from the duties, restrictions, and liabilities imposed on the trustee by AS

13.36.140

,

13.36.145

, or

13.36.150

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 13.36.195.
Renumbered in 1998, at which time references in (a), (a)(1), and (a)(2) to “AS

13.36.220

” were substituted for “AS 13.36.295” to reflect the 1998 renumbering of that section. In 2010, “AS

13.36.220

” was substituted for “AS 13.36.295” to reflect the 1998 renumbering of that section.

Sec. 13.36.194.
Power of beneficiary of trust.

A beneficiary of a trust affected by AS

13.36.105

—

13.36.220

may, if the beneficiary has full legal capacity and acts on full information, by written instrument delivered to the trustee, relieve the trustee, as regards the beneficiary, from any or all of the duties, restrictions, and liabilities that would otherwise be imposed on the trustee by AS

13.36.105

—

13.36.220

, except for the duties, restrictions, and liabilities imposed by AS

13.36.140

—

13.36.150

. The beneficiary may release the trustee from liability to the beneficiary for past violations of AS 13.36.105 — 13.36.220.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as
AS 13.36.200.
Renumbered in 1998, at which time all three references to “
AS

13.36.220

” were substituted for “
AS 13.36.295” to reflect the 1998 renumbering of that section.

Sec. 13.36.196.
Relieving trustee of duties, restrictions, and liability; power of the court.

A court of competent jurisdiction may, for cause shown and on notice to the beneficiaries, relieve a trustee from any or all of the duties and restrictions that would otherwise be placed on the trustee by AS

13.36.105

—

13.36.220

or wholly or partly excuse a trustee who has acted honestly and reasonably from liability for violations of AS

13.36.105

—

13.36.220

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 13.36.205.
Renumbered in 1998, at which time both references to “AS

13.36.220

” were substituted for “AS 13.36.295” to reflect the 1998 renumbering of that section.

Sec. 13.36.198.
Consequences of violations.

If a trustee violates a provision of AS

13.36.105

—

13.36.220

, the trustee may be removed as trustee under AS

13.36.076

and denied compensation in whole or in part, and a beneficiary, co-trustee, or successor trustee may treat the violation as a breach of trust.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998; am § 10 ch 7 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 13.36.210.
Renumbered in 1998, at which time the reference to “AS

13.36.220

” was substituted for “AS 13.36.295” to reflect the 1998 renumbering of that section.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 17, ch. 7, SLA 2008 provides that the 2008 amendment of this section applies “to trusts in existence on and after March 28, 2008.”

Sec. 13.36.215.
Definitions.

In AS

13.36.105

—

13.36.220

, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires,

“affiliate” means a person directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by another person or a person under direct or indirect common control with another person, including a person with whom a trustee has an express or implied agreement regarding the purchase of trust investments by each from the other, directly or indirectly, except a broker or stock exchange;

“relative” means a spouse, ancestor, descendant, brother, or sister;

“trust” means an express trust only;

“trustee” includes a trustee that is a corporation or a natural person and a successor or substitute trustee.

In AS

13.36.157

—

13.36.159

,

“appointed trust” means an irrevocable trust that receives principal from an invaded trust under AS

13.36.157

, including a new trust created by the settlor of the invaded trust or by the trustees, acting in that capacity, of the invaded trust;

“authorized trustee” means, with regard to an invaded trust, a trustee with the authority to pay trust principal to or for a current beneficiary; in this paragraph, “trustee” does not include a settlor or a beneficiary to whom income or principal must be paid, currently or in the future, or who is or will become eligible to receive a distribution of income or principal in the discretion of the trustee other than by the exercise of a power of appointment held in a nonfiduciary capacity;

“current beneficiary” means a person or, with regard to a class of persons, a person who is a member of the class, to whom a trustee may distribute principal when exercising a power under AS 13.36.157;

“invade” means pay directly to the beneficiary of a trust or apply to the benefit of a beneficiary;

“invaded trust” means an irrevocable inter vivos or testamentary trust the principal of which is appointed under AS 13.36.157;

“pooled trust” means a trust described in 42 U.S.C. 1396p(d)(4)(C) that meets the requirements for a pooled trust under the regulations of this state relating to the Medicaid treatment of trusts;

“principal” means the assets of a trust, including accrued and accumulated income, but excluding income that is currently required to be distributed;

“special needs trust” means a trust under 42 U.S.C. 1396p(d)(4)(A) that meets the requirements for a special needs trust under the regulations of this state relating to the Medicaid treatment of trusts;

“third-party trust” means a trust that is

established by a third party with the assets of the third party to provide for supplemental needs for a person eligible when the trust is created or at a future time for needs-based public assistance; and

exempt from the provisions of the regulations of this state relating to the Medicaid treatment of trusts;

“unlimited discretion” means the unlimited right to distribute principal if the right is not restricted by an ascertainable standard under 26 C.F.R. 25.2514-1.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998; am § 11 ch 45 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

13.36.290

.
Renumbered in 1998, at which time the reference to “AS

13.36.220

” was substituted for “AS 13.36.295” to reflect the 1998 renumbering of that section.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 48(b), ch. 45, SLA 2013, provides that (b) of this section applies “to a trust that exists before, on, or after September 9, 2013.”

Sec. 13.36.220.
Short title.

AS

13.36.105

—

13.36.220

may be cited as the Alaska Trusts Act.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 13.36.295.
Renumbered in 1998, at which time the reference to “AS

13.36.220

” was substituted for “AS 13.36.295” to reflect the 1998 renumbering of that section.